Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.180

Legislative power—How exercised.

Each member of the commission shall have the right to vote on all questions coming before the commission. Two members of the commission shall constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of at least two members shall be necessary to adopt any motion, resolution, ordinance, or course of action.

Every measure shall be reduced to writing and read before the vote is taken and upon every vote the yeas and nays shall be called and recorded.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.180. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 10, part; RRS s 9099, part.]